Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.080

Examinations—Fee.

Examinations of applicants for licensing, when required, shall be held at such times and places as determined by the board with the director's approval. The scope of the examination shall be directed to an applicant's ability to practice geology or any approved specialty of geology in a manner to ensure the safety of life, health, and property. A candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination. Subsequent examinations will be granted upon payment of a fee to be determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

[ 2000 c 253 s 9.]